Washington statutes.
RCW 36.48.040

Depositaries to be designated by treasurer—Deposited funds deemed in county treasury.

The county treasurer shall deposit with any depositary, which has fully complied with all requirements of RCW 36.48.010 through 36.48.060, any county money in his or her hands or under his or her official control, and for the purpose of making the quarterly settlement and counting funds in the hands of the treasurer any sums so on deposit shall be deemed to be in the county treasury.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4084; 1963 c 4 s 36.48.040. Prior: 1907 c 51 s 4; RRS s 5565.]